Arkansas, session 2025, SB106.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - SHARED SERVICES. There is hereby
established for the Department of Agriculture - Shared Services for the 2025-
2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) SC001 SECRETARY OF AGRICULTURE 1 GRADE SE05
(2) U072U DEPUTY SECRETARY OF AGRICULTURE 1 GRADE SE02
(3) U057U AGRI LABORATORY DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE01
(4) L104C AGRI LABORATORY COORDINATOR 1 GRADE MP04
(5) D022N IT SENIOR PROJECT MANAGER 1 GRADE IT09
(6) D007C INFORMATION SYSTEMS MANAGER 2 GRADE IT08
*BSS012*
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
(7) D054C COMPUTER SUPPORT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE IT05
(8) D063C COMPUTER SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT05
(9) D061C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATION SPEC 1 GRADE IT05
(10) D057C INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY MANAGER 1 GRADE IT05
(11) D052C SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE IT05
(12) D056C SYSTEMS COORDINATION ANALYST 1 GRADE IT05
(13) G345C AGRI GENERAL COUNSEL 1 GRADE GS15
(14) A151C CFO OF AGRICULTURE 1 GRADE GS14
(15) A010C AGENCY CONTROLLER II 1 GRADE GS13
(16) B006C AGRI CONSERVATION DIVISION MGR 1 GRADE GS13
(17) A010N AGRICULTURE CHIEF FISCAL OFFICER 1 GRADE GS13
(18) N001C DEPUTY CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER 1 GRADE GS13
(19) G004C MANAGING ATTORNEY 3 GRADE GS13
(20) B002C AGRI DIRECTOR OF MARKETING 1 GRADE GS12
(21) R006C HUMAN RESOURCES ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS12
(22) A027C ACCOUNTING OPERATIONS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(23) B010C AGRI DIVISION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(24) G076C ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES MANAGER 2 GRADE GS10
(25) T110C AGRI LAW ENFORCEMENT CHIEF 1 GRADE GS10
(26) B144C FARM SCHOOL COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS10
(27) A050C AGENCY FISCAL MANAGER 2 GRADE GS09
(28) T130C AGRI LAW ENFORCEMENT DEPUTY CHIEF 1 GRADE GS09
(29) G109C GRANTS MANAGER 4 GRADE GS09
(30) A082C ACCOUNTANT II 1 GRADE GS08
(31) T121C AGRI LAW ENFORCEMENT ASST CHIEF 1 GRADE GS08
(32) B049C AGRI PROGRAM MANAGER 4 GRADE GS08
(33) G126C FINANCE PROGRAM COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(34) X109C AGRI INVESTIGATOR 3 GRADE GS07
(35) B072C AGRI PROGRAM COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(36) R024C ASSISTANT PERSONNEL MANAGER 2 GRADE GS07
(37) V008C BUYER SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS07
(38) A073C PROGRAM/FIELD AUDITOR SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS07
(39) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(40) P049C GRAPHIC ARTIST 1 GRADE GS06
(41) G179C LEGAL SERVICES SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(42) P027C PUBLIC INFORMATION SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
(43) V014C BUYER 3 GRADE GS05
(44) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 3 GRADE GS05
(45) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
(46) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 65

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - SHARED SERVICES. There is hereby authorized,
for the Department of Agriculture - Shared Services for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be
known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such
purposes: three (3) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates
of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and
Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate
classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - SHARED SERVICES PAYING ACCOUNT. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the
paying account as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Agriculture -
Shared Services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $4,311,179
(02) EXTRA HELP 21,900
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,482,467
(04) UNIFORM ALLOWANCE 140,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 3,162,067
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 33,500
(C) PROF. FEES 704,500
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 200,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) PROMOTIONAL ITEMS 60,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $10,115,613

03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
SECTION 4. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Department of Agriculture for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U048U LIVESTOCK & POULTRY DIVISION DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE01
(2) U043U NATURAL RESOURCES DIVISION DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE01
(3) U044U PLANT INDUSTRY DIVISION DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE01
(4) U003U STATE FORESTER 1 GRADE SE01
(5) B004N STATE VETERINARIAN 1 GRADE MP05
(6) L106C VETERINARY SPECIALIST 5 GRADE MP04
(7) D040C GIS ANALYST 1 GRADE IT06
(8) G052N NATURAL RESOURCES DEPUTY DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS15
(9) B005C AGRI WATER DEVELOPMENT DIVISION MGR 1 GRADE GS13
(10) G344C AGRI WATER RESOURCES DIV MANAGER 1 GRADE GS13
(11) B004C AGRI WATER RESOURCES DIVISION MGR 1 GRADE GS13
(12) B001C DEPUTY STATE FORESTER 1 GRADE GS13
(13) N058N LIVESTOCK & POULTRY DIVISION DEPUTY 1 GRADE GS13
(14) B015C ENGINEER SUPERVISOR 3 GRADE GS12
(15) G036N PLANT INDUSTRY DIVISION DEPUTY DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS12
(16) B010C AGRI DIVISION MANAGER 6 GRADE GS11
(17) B014C ASST STATE FORESTER 3 GRADE GS11
(18) B023C ENGINEER, P.E. 8 GRADE GS11
(19) B149C SR LABORATORY SCIENTIST 2 GRADE GS11
(20) B022C DISTRICT FORESTER 7 GRADE GS10
(21) E013C EDUCATION PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(22) X217C NATIONAL POULTRY IMPROVEMENT PLAN COORD 1 GRADE GS10
(23) B136C AGRI LAB QUALITY MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(24) S005C AVIATION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(25) B037C CHEMIST SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS09
(26) B035C GEOLOGY SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS09
(27) G109C GRANTS MANAGER 2 GRADE GS09
(28) B034C MICROBIOLOGIST SUPERVISOR 5 GRADE GS09
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
(29) B038C STATE FOREST MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(30) B049C AGRI PROGRAM MANAGER 22 GRADE GS08
(31) X148C AIRCRAFT PILOT 2 GRADE GS08
(32) B067C ARCHAEOLOGIST 8 GRADE GS08
(33) B055C ECOLOGIST COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(34) G126C FINANCE PROGRAM COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(35) B043C PROFESSIONAL GEOLOGIST 2 GRADE GS08
(36) A041C PROGRAM FISCAL MANAGER 2 GRADE GS08
(37) B127C SENIOR MICROBIOLOGIST 1 GRADE GS08
(38) B058C STAFF FORESTER 5 GRADE GS08
(39) A089C ACCOUNTANT I 1 GRADE GS07
(40) C015C AGRI ADMINISTRATIVE COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS07
(41) X058C AGRI COMMODITY AREA SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS07
(42) X111C AGRI INSPECTOR SUPERVISOR 4 GRADE GS07
(43) B072C AGRI PROGRAM COORDINATOR 9 GRADE GS07
(44) B081C CHEMIST 16 GRADE GS07
(45) B065C ECOLOGIST 1 GRADE GS07
(46) X054C ENVIRONMENTAL PROGRAM COORDINATOR 7 GRADE GS07
(47) B080C FORESTER 39 GRADE GS07
(48) G147C GRANTS COORDINATOR 3 GRADE GS07
(49) B060C LAND RESOURCE SPECIALIST SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS07
(50) B077C MICROBIOLOGIST 12 GRADE GS07
(51) P013C PUBLIC INFORMATION COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(52) G145C RURAL CONST GRANT/FINANCIAL OFFICER 6 GRADE GS07
(53) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 7 GRADE GS06
(54) X146C AGRI INSPECTOR III 34 GRADE GS06
(55) B147C AGRI PROGRAM SPECIALIST 14 GRADE GS06
(56) D076C COMMUNICATIONS SYSTEMS SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS06
(57) B088C COUNTY FOREST RANGER 60 GRADE GS06
(58) G180C GRANTS ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(59) B078C METROLOGIST 2 GRADE GS06
(60) A084C PROGRAM/FIELD AUDIT SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS06
(61) P027C PUBLIC INFORMATION SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(62) E046C TRAINING INSTRUCTOR 2 GRADE GS06
(63) X157C AGRI INSPECTOR II 96 GRADE GS05
(64) X097C AGRI SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
(65) S036C AUTO/DIESEL MECHANIC SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS05
(66) X129C CONSTRUCTION INSPECTOR 1 GRADE GS05
(67) B098C FOREST RANGER II 108 GRADE GS05
(68) S034C INTERSTATE TRUCK DRIVER 2 GRADE GS05
(69) B093C LAND RESOURCE SPECIALIST 3 GRADE GS05
(70) C054C LOCAL OFFICE ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST 11 GRADE GS05
(71) D081C TELECOMMUNICATIONS SPECIALIST 7 GRADE GS05
(72) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 13 GRADE GS04
(73) X165C AGRI INSPECTOR I 2 GRADE GS04
(74) B096C AGRI SEED ANALYST 5 GRADE GS04
(75) S053C AUTO/DIESEL MECHANIC 4 GRADE GS04
(76) S040C CALIBRATION TECHNICIAN 2 GRADE GS04
(77) B101C NATURAL RESOURCES PROGRAM TECHNICIAN 5 GRADE GS04
(78) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 11 GRADE GS03
(79) S060C HEAVY EQUIPMENT OPERATOR 3 GRADE GS02
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 610

SECTION 5. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized,
for the Department of Agriculture - Operations for the 2025-2026 fiscal year,
the following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known
as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes:
one hundred eighty-one (181) temporary or part-time employees, when needed,
at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification
and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate
classification.

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the Department of
Agriculture Fund Account, for personal services and operating expenses of the
Department of Agriculture - Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $10,195,891
(02) EXTRA HELP 74,131
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 4,060,189
(04) OVERTIME 21,571
(05) UNIFORM ALLOWANCE 3,200
(06) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,716,272
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 33,613
(C) PROF. FEES 33,500
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(07) PAYMENT IN LIEU OF TAXES 6,148
(08) BOLL WEEVIL PROGRAM 5,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $16,149,515

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - LIVESTOCK AND POULTRY - ANIMAL DISEASE
CONTROL AND ERADICATION PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the Livestock and Poultry
Commission Disease and Pest Control Fund, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Agriculture - Livestock and Poultry Commission
- Animal Disease Control and Eradication Program for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $543,206
(02) EXTRA HELP 55,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 245,853
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 213,846
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 120,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,177,905

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - LIVESTOCK AND POULTRY - EGG GRADING PROGRAM.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
from the Poultry and Egg Grading Fund, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Agriculture - Livestock and Poultry Commission
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,550,361
(02) EXTRA HELP 67,500
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 745,484
(04) OVERTIME 300,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 252,971
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 18,350
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 100,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 1,594,968
(07) EGG PROMOTION EXPENSE 64,500
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $4,694,134

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - AGRI LABORATORY TESTING. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the
Livestock and Poultry Special Revenue Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Agriculture - Agri Laboratory Testing
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $265,600
(02) EXTRA HELP 34,500
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 115,019
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,696,745
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 25,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 310,000
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
(E) DATA PROC. 0

TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,446,864

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - LIVESTOCK AND POULTRY - EQUINE INFECTIOUS
ANEMIA. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to
be payable from the Livestock and Poultry Equine Infectious Anemia Control
Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of
Agriculture - Livestock and Poultry Commission - Equine Infectious Anemia for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $76,551
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 29,560
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 233,046
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 100,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $439,157

SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION - LIVESTOCK AND POULTRY - ANIMAL HEALTH.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable
from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of
Agriculture - Livestock and Poultry Commission - Animal Health for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $389,331
(02) EXTRA HELP 8,311
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 167,396
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 118,111
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 5,350
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $688,499

SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION PLANT BOARD - ADMINISTRATION/PEST CONTROL.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable
from the Plant Board Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of
the Department of Agriculture - State Plant Board - Administration/Pest
Control for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $4,374,438
(02) EXTRA HELP 800,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,870,407
(04) OVERTIME 250,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,158,314
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 103,613
(C) PROF. FEES 594,510
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 1,200,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) PROJECT PLANNING, EDUCATION, AND
OUTREACH GRANTS AND AID 394,140
(07) PEST ERADICATION 1,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $11,745,422

SECTION 13. APPROPRIATION - PLANT BOARD - PUBLIC GRAIN WAREHOUSE
INSPECTION PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Agriculture, to be payable from the Plant Board Fund, for personal services
and operating expenses of the Department of Agriculture - State Plant Board -
Public Grain Warehouse Inspection Program for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $202,230
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 79,407
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 60,614
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 4,613
(C) PROF. FEES 1,200
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $348,064

SECTION 14. APPROPRIATION - PLANT BOARD - PESTICIDE SURVEILLANCE.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable
from the Plant Board Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of
the Department of Agriculture - State Plant Board - Pesticide Surveillance
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $179,529
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 73,932
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 40,783
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 6,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $300,244

SECTION 15. APPROPRIATION - PLANT BOARD - APIARY. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the Plant
Board Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of
Agriculture - State Plant Board - Apiary for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $112,555
(02) EXTRA HELP 10,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 43,391
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 42,170
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $208,116

SECTION 16. APPROPRIATION - AGRI PRODUCT MARKETING PROGRAM. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the
federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Agriculture -
Agri Product Marketing Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,869,935
(02) EXTRA HELP 50,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 666,688
(04) OVERTIME 13,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 461,112
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 538,083
(C) PROF. FEES 50,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) PRODUCT MARKETING GRANTS & AID 854,899
(07) PROMOTIONAL ITEMS 5,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $4,508,717
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106

SECTION 17. APPROPRIATION - PLANT BOARD - REFUNDS/TRANSFERS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the
cash funds as defined by Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for operating expenses,
refunds, and transfers to the State Treasury by the Department of Agriculture
- State Plant Board - Refunds/Transfers for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $500
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 50,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $50,500

SECTION 18. APPROPRIATION - PLANT BOARD - PESTICIDE/PLANT REGULATORY
PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to
be payable from the Abandoned Agricultural Pesticide and Plant Regulator
Disposal Trust Fund, for operating expenses of the Department of Agriculture
- State Plant Board - Pesticide/Plant Regulatory Program for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $1,500,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,500,000

03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
SECTION 19. APPROPRIATION - AGRI SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the Agri
Scholarship Program Fund, for grants for internships and scholarships of the
Department of Agriculture - Agri Scholarship Program for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) AGRI SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM $970,000

SECTION 20. APPROPRIATION - FORESTRY - OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the State
Forestry Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department
of Agriculture - State Forestry Commission - Operations for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $7,084,408
(02) EXTRA HELP 255,855
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 2,989,693
(04) OVERTIME 52,400
(05) UNIFORM ALLOWANCE 0
(06) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 2,710,744
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 100,000
(C) PROF. FEES 280,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 1,663,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(07) FORESTRY GRANTS AND AID 269,981
(08) DISTRICT OFFICE REPLACEMENT 400,000
(09) FOREST ACTION PLAN 70,000
(10) FEDERAL INITIATIVE PROGRAM 138,512
(11) UNDERSERVED LANDOWNER OUTREACH 500,000
(12) OUTREACH AND PLANTING AID 225,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $16,739,593
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106

SECTION 21. APPROPRIATION - FORESTRY - RURAL COMMUNITY FIRE PROTECTION
- FEDERAL. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture,
to be payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, for personal services, operating expenses and federal
matching grants to purchase firefighting equipment of the Department of
Agriculture - State Forestry Commission - Rural Community Fire Protection -
Federal for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $108,363
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 41,414
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 399,816
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 60,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 270,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) RURAL COMMUNITY MATCH GRANTS 822,563
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,702,156

SECTION 22. APPROPRIATION - FORESTRY - URBAN FORESTRY SERVICES -
FEDERAL. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to
be payable from the State Forestry Fund, for personal services, operating
expenses and urban forestry matching grants of the Department of Agriculture
- State Forestry Commission - Urban Forestry Services - Federal for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $67,500
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 50,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) URBAN FORESTRY MATCHING GRANTS AND AID 82,000
(03) URBAN AND COMMUNITY FORESTRY 1,875,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,074,500

SECTION 23. APPROPRIATION - FORESTRY - RURAL FIRE PROTECTION SERVICE
LOANS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be
payable from the Rural Fire Protection Revolving Fund, for loans to
communities for fire protection by the Department of Agriculture - State
Forestry Commission - Rural Fire Protection Service Loans for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) RURAL FIRE PROTECTION LOANS $1,200,000

SECTION 24. APPROPRIATION - FORESTRY - STATE FORESTRY TRUST PROGRAM.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable
from the State Forestry Trust Fund, for management and operating expenses,
fire control, communications, contracting for assistance, and other services
of the Department of Agriculture - State Forestry Commission - State Forestry
Trust Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $200,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 100,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 2,250,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) FIRE CONTROL/COMMUNICATE 900,000
(03) MANAGEMENT & OPERATIONS 300,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $3,750,000

SECTION 25. APPROPRIATION - FORESTRY - SOUTHERN PINE BEETLE PREVENTION.
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable
from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, for grants by the Department of Agriculture - State Forestry
Commission - Southern Pine Beetle Prevention for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) SOUTHERN PINE BEETLE GRANTS AND AID $230,000

SECTION 26. APPROPRIATION - FORESTRY - FOREST LEGACY. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the
federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
operating expenses, grants and aid by the Department of Agriculture - State
Forestry Commission - Forest Legacy for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $6,599
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 1,800
(C) PROF. FEES 5,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) FOREST LEGACY ADMINISTRATION 157,000
(03) WHITE RIVER HEADWATERS PROJECT 1,455,000
(04) FOREST LEGACY PROGRAM 6,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $7,625,399

SECTION 27. APPROPRIATION - FORESTRY - SILVICULTURAL NON-POINT PROGRAM.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable
from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, for operating expenses of the Department of Agriculture - State
Forestry Commission - Silvicultural Non-Point Program for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $36,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 4,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $40,000

SECTION 28. APPROPRIATION - AGRICULTURE CASH OPERATING FUND. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the
cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, for operating expenses of the Department of Agriculture
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $40,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 200,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) PROMOTIONAL ITEMS 2,000
(03) BUFFALO RIVER WATERSHED GRANTS &
PROJECTS 160,682
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $402,682

SECTION 29. APPROPRIATION - INDUSTRIAL HEMP RESEARCH PROGRAM. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the
Arkansas Industrial Hemp Program Fund, for personal services and operating
expenses to administer the Industrial Hemp Program of the Department of
Agriculture - State Plant Board for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) INDUSTRIAL HEMP RESEARCH PROGRAM $99,500

SECTION 30. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS - REGISTERED FORESTERS. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from
the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services and operating expenses of
the Department of Agriculture - Registered Foresters for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) EXTRA HELP $37,000
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 3,064
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 6,329
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $46,393

SECTION 31. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS - VETERINARY MEDICINE. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the
Veterinary Examiners Board Fund, for personal services, operating expenses
and scholarships of the Department of Agriculture - Veterinary Medicine for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $61,131
(02) EXTRA HELP 21,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 23,830
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 15,996
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 281
(C) PROF. FEES 16,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) RURAL VETERINARY STUDENT SCHOLARSHIP
PROGRAM 30,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $168,238

SECTION 32. APPROPRIATION - FORESTRY - RURAL FIRE PROTECTION PROGRAM.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable
from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for operating expenses of the
Department of Agriculture - State Forestry Commission - Rural Fire Protection
Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) RURAL FIRE PROTECTION PROGRAM $70,000

SECTION 33. APPROPRIATION - MEAT INSPECTION PROGRAM. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the State
Meat Inspection Program Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of
the Department of Agriculture - State Meat Inspection Program for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) STATE MEAT INSPECTION PROGRAM $606,083

SECTION 34. APPROPRIATION - MEAT INSPECTION PROGRAM - GENERAL REVENUE.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable
from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Agriculture - State Meat Inspection
Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $150,000
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 85,000
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 15,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $250,000

SECTION 35. APPROPRIATION - FERAL HOG ERADICATION. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the Feral
Hog Eradication Fund, for expenses associated with the eradication efforts to
eliminate feral hogs by the Department of Agriculture for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) FERAL HOG ERADICATION $200,000

SECTION 36. APPROPRIATION - AGRI FAIR FUNDING PROGRAM. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the Agri
Fair Fund, for personal services, fair funding and operating expenses of the
Department of Agriculture for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ARKANSAS STATE FAIR $84,000
(02) ARKANSAS YOUTH EXPO 48,000
(03) ARKANSAS-OKLAHOMA FAIR 54,000
(04) COUNTY FAIRS 1,095,272
(05) DISTRICT JR LIVESTOCK SHOWS 27,000
(06) NORTHEAST DISTRICT FAIR 54,000
(07) NORTHWEST DISTRICT FAIR 54,000
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
(08) SOUTHWEST DISTRICT FAIR 54,000
(09) SOUTHEAST DISTRICT FAIR 54,000
(10) NORTH CENTRAL DISTRICT FAIR ` 54,000
(11) FOUR STATES FAIR 54,000
(12) PROGRAM OPERATION EXPENSES 23,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,655,272

SECTION 37. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS FORESTERS FOR THE FUTURE
SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Agriculture, to be payable from the Arkansas Foresters for the Future
Scholarship Fund, for scholarships of the Department of Agriculture -
Arkansas Foresters For The Future Scholarship Program for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) SCHOLARSHIPS $40,000


SECTION 38. APPROPRIATION - NRC - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the
Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Agriculture - Arkansas Natural Resources
Commission for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,237,928
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 448,479
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 193,182
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 10,165
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) SURVEYS & INVESTIGATIONS 3,900
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
(05) WATER PLANNING 130,981
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,024,635

SECTION 39. APPROPRIATION - NRC - CASH. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the cash fund deposited
in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State,
for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Agriculture
- Arkansas Natural Resources Commission for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,403,559
(02) EXTRA HELP 30,800
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 510,876
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 377,298
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 27,000
(C) PROF. FEES 910,002
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 225,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) SOIL & WATER GRANTS & LOANS 6,202,017
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $9,686,552

SECTION 40. APPROPRIATION - NRC - DAM INVENTORY. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the
federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Agriculture -
Arkansas Natural Resources Commission - Dam Inventory for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $89,358
(02) EXTRA HELP 10,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 29,211
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 49,216
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 17,000
(C) PROF. FEES 130,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 10,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) GRANTS & AID DAM - SAFETY PROJECTS 76,997
(06) HIGH HAZARD DAMS REHAB 226,803
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $638,585

SECTION 41. APPROPRIATION - NRC - FLOOD INSURANCE PROGRAM. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the
federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Agriculture -
Arkansas Natural Resources Commission - Flood Insurance Program for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $160,867
(02) EXTRA HELP 10,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 65,508
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 268,504
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 32,571
(C) PROF. FEES 1,700,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 25,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) GRANTS & AID - FLOOD HAZARD
MITIGATION GRANTS 3,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $5,262,450

SECTION 42. APPROPRIATION - NRC - WATER QUALITY PLAN IMPLEMENTAITON.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable
from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Agriculture - Arkansas Natural
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
Resources Commission - Water Quality Plan Implementation for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $317,076
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 104,333
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 3,089
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 1,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) WATER QUALITY MATCH GRANTS 500,000
(05) WATER QUALITY TECHNICIAN 750,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,675,498

SECTION 43. APPROPRIATION - NRC - WATER, WASTE DISPOSAL, AND POLLUTION
ABATEMENT PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Agriculture, to be payable from the Water, Waste Disposal, Pollution
Abatement, Administrative and Research Facilities Construction Fund, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Agriculture -
Arkansas Natural Resources Commission - Water, Waste Disposal, and Pollution
Abatement Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $137,764
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 45,731
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 4,400
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) PROJECT DISBURSEMENTS 90,000,000
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $90,187,895

SECTION 44. APPROPRIATION - NRC - NONPOINT SOURCE POLLUTION CONTROL
PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to
be payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department
of Agriculture - Arkansas Natural Resources Commission - Nonpoint Source
Pollution Control Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $294,446
(02) EXTRA HELP 25,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 113,166
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 282,774
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 50,000
(C) PROF. FEES 706,630
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 50,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) NON POINT SOURCE POLLUTION GRANTS 5,642,276
(06) HYPOXIA NUTRIENT REDUCTION 200,000
(07) SMALL/ DISADVANTAGED COMMUNITIES 637,000
(08) SEWER OVERFLOW AND STORMWATER REUSE 1,606,373
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $9,607,665

SECTION 45. APPROPRIATION - NRC - CONSTRUCTION ASSISTANCE REVOLVING
LOAN FUND PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Agriculture, to be payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services and operating expenses of
the Department of Agriculture - Arkansas Natural Resources Commission -
Construction Assistance Revolving Loan Fund Program for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $631,141
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 233,934
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 111,841
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 12,219
(C) PROF. FEES 13,500
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,002,635

SECTION 46. APPROPRIATION - NRC - BEAVER ERADICATION PROGRAM. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the
Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for grants to the conservation districts
for beaver control programs within the districts of the Department of
Agriculture - Arkansas Natural Resources Commission - Beaver Eradication
Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) GRANTS FOR BEAVER CONTROL PROGRAMS $150,000

SECTION 47. APPROPRIATION - NRC - GRANTS & ATTORNEY SERVICES. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the
Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for operating expenses of the Department
of Agriculture - Arkansas Natural Resources Commission - Grants and Attorney
Services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) RIVER BASIN COMPACT $42,820
(02) LEGAL COUNSEL 5,871
(03) COMMITTEE/COMMISSION EXPENSES 10,000
(04) CONSERVATION PROJECTS 3,500
(05) ARKANSAS RIVER COMPACT 17,800
(06) RED RIVER COMPACT 11,720
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $91,711

SECTION 48. APPROPRIATION - NRC - CONSERVATION DISTRICT PROGRAM GRANTS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable
from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for personal services matching
and grants to conservation districts of the Department of Agriculture -
Arkansas Natural Resources Commission - Conservation District Program Grants
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) GRANTS TO CONSERVATION DISTRICTS $250,000
(02) CONSERVATION DISTRICT GRANTS &
ASSISTANCE 1,522,672
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,772,672

SECTION 49. APPROPRIATION - NRC - WATER RESEARCH. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the
Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for operating expenses of the Department
of Agriculture - Arkansas Natural Resources Commission - Water Research for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) WATER RESEARCH/CONTRACT $42,800

SECTION 50. APPROPRIATION - NRC - WATER, SEWER, AND SOLID WASTE -
REVOLVING. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture,
to be payable from the Water, Sewer and Solid Waste Revolving Fund, for
water, sewer, and solid waste grants of the Department of Agriculture -
Arkansas Natural Resources Commission - Water, Sewer, and Solid Waste -
Revolving for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) WATER, SEWER AND SOLID WASTE GRANTS &
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
AID $6,000,000

SECTION 51. APPROPRIATION - NRC - WATER, SEWER, AND SOLID WASTE -
STATE. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be
payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for water, sewer, and
solid waste grants or loans that will be repaid to the water, sewer and solid
waste revolving appropriation of the Department of Agriculture - Arkansas
Natural Resources Commission - Water, Sewer, and Solid Waste - State for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) WATER, SEWER AND SOLID WASTE GRANTS $84,296

SECTION 52. APPROPRIATION - NRC - WATER USE PROGRAM. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the
federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
reporting expenses of the Department of Agriculture - Arkansas Natural
Resources Commission - Water Use Program for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) WATER USE DATA REPORTING $125,000

SECTION 53. APPROPRIATION - NRC - CONSERVATION TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable
from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of
Agriculture - Arkansas Natural Resources Commission - Conservation Technical
Assistance for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $164,013
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 61,434
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 120,246
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 40,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) RESOURCE GRANTS 906,637
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,292,330

SECTION 54. APPROPRIATION - NRC - UNPAVED ROADS PROGRAM. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the
Arkansas Unpaved Roads Program Fund, for grants or operating expenses of the
Department of Agriculture - Arkansas Natural Resources Commission - Unpaved
Roads Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) UNPAVED ROADS GRANTS & AID OR
OPERATING EXPENSES $600,000

SECTION 55. APPROPRIATION NRC - FERAL SWINE ERADICATION AND CONTROL -
FEDERAL. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to
be payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State, for expenses associated with the eradication efforts to
eliminate feral swine by the Department of Agriculture - Arkansas Natural
Resources Commission - Feral Swine Eradication and Control - Federal for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) FERAL SWINE ERADICATION AND CONTROL $1,500,000

SECTION 56. APPROPRIATION - NRC - OPERATIONS - SOIL CLASSIFIERS. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from
the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for operating expenses of the Department of
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
Agriculture - Arkansas Natural Resources Commission - Soil Classifiers for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $1,296
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,296

SECTION 57. APPROPRIATION - NRC - ALLIANCE LANDOWNER CONSERVATION
PRACTICES - FEDERAL. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Agriculture, to be payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for expenses associated with Alliance Landowner
Conservation Practices of the Department of Agriculture - Arkansas Natural
Resources Commission - Alliance Landowner Conservation Practices - Federal
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ALLIANCE LANDOWNER CONSERVATION
PRACTICES $2,445,538

SECTION 58. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
FAIR FUND TRANSFER. On July 1 of each fiscal year, or as soon as is
practical, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may transfer the amount
needed for distribution by the Department of Agriculture to fund fairs from
the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account to the Agri Fair Fund.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 59. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
SHARED SERVICES.
(a)(1) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may create paying accounts
on his or her books and on the books of the Treasurer of the State and
Auditor of State for the payment of all personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Agriculture.
(2) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall direct the transfer
of funds and appropriations to the Shared Services Paying Account
appropriation section of this act on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(3) The transfer authority provided to the department in subdivision
(a)(2) of this section may be used to make transfers only within the
department's appropriation act or between other appropriations acts
authorized for the department.
(4) The provisions of this section shall be in effect from the date of
passage through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 60. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
FUND TRANSFER. The Deputy Director of the Livestock and Poultry Commission,
with prior approval of the Arkansas Legislative Council or the Joint Budget
Committee, the approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, and for the
reimbursing of documented expenditures designated by law to be made from the
transferred special revenue, may transfer funds among the Livestock and
Poultry Equine Infectious Anemia Control Fund, Livestock and Poultry
Commission Disease and Pest Control Fund, Livestock and Poultry Special
Revenue Fund, Livestock and Poultry Commission Swine Testing Fund, and the
Poultry and Egg Grading Fund or from these funds to the Livestock and Poultry
Fund Account. The purpose of these transfers shall only be for accurate
allocation of incurred costs between the funds. Requests for fund transfer
will at least include the total amount to be transferred, to and from which
funds, the nature, purpose, and time period of the expenditures being
reimbursed, and any other information requested by the Legislative Council or
the Joint Budget Committee.
Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of
appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and
the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly
has determined that the Arkansas Agriculture Department - Livestock and
Poultry Commission may operate more efficiently if some flexibility is
provided to the Arkansas Agriculture Department - Livestock and Poultry
Commission authorizing broad powers under this Section. Therefore, it is
both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight
by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this
section. If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint
Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent
jurisdiction, this entire section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 61. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
TRANSFER PROVISION - PEST ERADICATION. If the State Plant Board determines
that the demands of pest eradication efforts require additional personnel
expenses, with the approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and
approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee, appropriations
may be transferred from the Pest Eradication Program special line item to the
line items for Regular Salaries, Extra Help, Overtime, and Personal Services
Matching.
Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of
appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year
is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and
the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly
has determined that the State Plant Board may operate more efficiently if
some flexibility is provided to the State Plant Board authorizing broad
powers under this Section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of
the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee as provided by this
section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint
Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement
of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled
unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is
void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 62. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
TRANSFER PROVISION. If the State Forestry Commission determines that
temporary firefighters, dispatchers, or pilots are required to meet the
demands of a wildfire season, and upon approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State, appropriations may be transferred from either Extra Help or
Professional Fees and Services to the proper character code for the
employment of such personnel.
If the State Forestry Commission determines that the deployment of air
tankers for fighting wildfires requires additional Professional Fees and
Services, and upon the approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State,
excess appropriation in Regular Salaries or Personal Services Matching may be
transferred to Professional Fees and Services in the Operations and Forestry
- Rural Community Fire Protection - Federal appropriation sections.
If the State Forestry Commission determines that the most effective way for
it to cooperate in the growing and distribution of forest planting stock is
by contracting work with private vendors and/or hiring temporary employees
for seasonal work, the Commission is hereby authorized, upon approval by the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, to transfer the necessary appropriation
authorized for Extra Help and Maintenance and General Operation in the
Operations and Forestry - Rural Community Fire Protection - Federal
appropriation sections.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 63. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
REFUND TO EXPENDITURE. The Arkansas Forestry Commission is authorized to
charge fees to federal agencies and other states to reimburse the Commission
for expenditures made on behalf of these governmental units. These fees
shall be deposited into the State Forestry Fund in the State Treasury as a
refund to expenditure.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 64. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. CARRY
FORWARD. Notwithstanding any law pertaining to the transfer of year-end fund
balances or any law to the contrary, any funds up to $500,000 which remain in
the Department of Agriculture Fund Account at the end of a fiscal year shall
remain in the Department of Agriculture Fund Account and be made available to
fund appropriation(s) authorized by law to be made for maintenance and
operating costs associated with wildfire suppression, as well as the purchase
of fire suppression equipment for the Forestry Division and made payable from
the Department of Agriculture Fund Account for the following fiscal year.
Any carry forward of unexpended balance of funding up to $500,000 as
authorized herein, may be carried forward under the following conditions:
(1) Prior to June 30, 2026, the Agency shall by written statement set forth
its reason(s) for the need to carry forward said funding to the Department of
Finance and Administration Office of Budget;
(2) The Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget shall
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee all
amounts carried forward by the September Arkansas Legislative Council or
Joint Budget Committee meeting which report shall include the name of the
Agency, Board, Commission or Institution and the amount of the funding
carried forward, from the first fiscal year to the second fiscal year, the
program name or line item, the funding source of that appropriation and a
copy of the written request set forth in (1) above:
(3) Each Agency, Board, Commission or Institution shall provide a written
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
containing all information set forth in item (2) above, along with a written
statement as so the current status of the project, contract, purpose etc. for
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
which the carry forward was originally requested no later than thirty (30)
days prior to the time the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution presents
its budget request to the Arkansas Legislative Council/Joint Budget
Committee; and
(4) Thereupon, the Department of Finance and Administration shall include
all information obtained in item (3) above in the budget manuals and/or a
statement of noncompliance by the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2025
through June 30, 2026.

SECTION 65. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. FUND
TRANSFER. (A)(1) If the Arkansas Department of Agriculture determines
additional funding is required to support the purchase of firefighting
equipment and forest fire suppression activities, to include the maintenance
and operations costs associated with fire suppression, the Department of
Agriculture with prior approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, may
transfer the sum of one million one hundred eighty thousand one hundred
dollars ($1,180,100) of the amount authorized for transfer by Act 154 of
2012, to the State Forestry Fund.
(2) The transfer authority provided to the department in subdivision (A)(1)
of this section may be used in furtherance of the State Forestry Trust
Program.
(3) The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2025
through June 30, 2026.

SECTION 66. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
REALLOCATION OF RESOURCES. The Department of Agriculture provides a wide
range of services to all Arkansans. The specific service needs, along with
staffing required to meet them, can vary significantly due to factors such as
natural disasters, changing federal mandates, and job market variations like
wildland firefighters, dispatchers, foresters, engineers, and
microbiologists' shortages. These factors make it challenging for the
Department to accurately predict the exact needs for positions across its
different appropriations throughout any fiscal year. To respond swiftly to
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
changing needs and to utilize resources effectively, the Department of
Agriculture is authorized to reallocate resources as necessary. Upon
determining that a reallocation is essential for the efficient and effective
operation of the department, the Secretary of the Department of Agriculture,
with the approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and Legislative
Council or the Joint Budget Committee, if meeting in Legislative Session, may
request to transfer positions between existing business areas of the
department. Transfer authority shall be limited to no more than 5% of the
total authorized department positions in any fiscal year.
Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of
appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year
is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and
the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly has
determined that the Department of Agriculture may operate more efficiently if
some flexibility is provided to the Department of Agriculture authorizing
broad powers under the Reallocation of Resources provisions herein.
Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly
maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or
Joint Budget Committee as provided by this section. The requirement of
approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a
severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by the
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a
court jurisdiction, this entire section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2025,
through June 30, 2026.

SECTION 67. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
TRANSFER PROVISION- NRC. At the end of each fiscal year, the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State shall authorize the transfer of obligated water, sewer,
and solid waste funds, as provided in the appropriation act for the Natural
Resources Commission in the appropriation entitled "Water, Sewer and Solid
Waste - State", from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, to the Water,
Sewer and Solid Waste Revolving Fund.
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 68. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. CARRY
FORWARD - NRC. At the end of each fiscal year, the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State shall authorize the carry forward of funds to support the amount of
obligated grants that are certified by the Natural Resources Commission for
Matching Grants in the appropriation entitled "Water Quality Plan
Implementation".
Any carry forward of unexpended balance of funding as authorized herein, may
be carried forward under the following conditions:
(1) Prior to June 30, 2025 2026 the Agency shall by written statement set
forth its reason(s) for the need to carry forward said funding to the
Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget;
(2) The Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget shall
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council all amounts carried forward by the
September Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee meeting
which report shall include the name of the Agency, Board, Commission or
Institution and the amount of the funding carried forward from the first
fiscal year to the second fiscal year, the program name or line item, the
funding source of that appropriation and a copy of the written request set
forth in (1) above;
(3) Each Agency, Board, Commission or Institution shall provide a written
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
containing all information set forth in item (2) above, along with a written
statement as to the current status of the project, contract, purpose etc. for
which the carry forward was originally requested no later than thirty (30)
days prior to the time the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution presents
its budget request to the Arkansas Legislative Council/Joint Budget
Committee; and
(4) Thereupon, the Department of Finance and Administration shall include
all information obtained in item (3) above in the budget manuals and/or a
statement of non-compliance by the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.
03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106

SECTION 69. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. CARRY
FORWARD - NRC.
At the end of the fiscal year, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall
authorize the carry forward of funds to support the amount of obligated
grants that are certified by the Natural Resources Commission for Water
Quality Technicians in the appropriation entitled "Water Quality Plan
Implementation".
Any carry forward of unexpended balance of funding as authorized herein, may
be carried forward under the following conditions:
(1) Prior to June 30, 2025 2026 the Agency shall by written statement set
forth its reason(s) for the need to carry forward said funding to the
Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget;
(2) The Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget shall
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council all amounts carried forward by the
September Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee meeting
which report shall include the name of the Agency, Board, Commission or
Institution and the amount of the funding carried forward from the first
fiscal year to the second fiscal year, the program name or line item, the
funding source of that appropriation and a copy of the written request set
forth in (1) above;
(3) Each Agency, Board, Commission or Institution shall provide a written
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
containing all information set forth in item (2) above, along with a written
statement as to the current status of the project, contract, purpose etc. for
which the carry forward was originally requested no later than thirty (30)
days prior to the time the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution presents
its budget request to the Arkansas Legislative Council/Joint Budget
Committee; and
(4) Thereupon, the Department of Finance and Administration shall include
all information obtained in item (3) above in the budget manuals and/or a
statement of non-compliance by the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S3/31/25 SB106
SECTION 70. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 71. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 72. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee




03-31-2025 17:32:01 BSS012